Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 49
LIVESTOCK WATER TANKS

Section

35-49-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Livestock Water Tank Act of Colorado".

Source:

L. 41:

p. 525, § 1.

CSA:

C. 160, § 226.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-1.

35-49-102. Legislative declaration.

It is the policy of the state of Colorado to encourage and improve range conditions for livestock within its borders through the construction of watering tanks, to provide a system of priorities of right of use thereof, and to protect adjudicated water rights and the public interest by providing an official record and reasonable public supervision of such watering tanks.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 525, § 2.

CSA:

C. 160, § 227.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-2.

35-49-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Livestock water tanks" includes all reservoirs created by dams constructed after April 17, 1941, on watercourses, the channels of which are normally dry as determined by the state engineer, having a capacity not exceeding ten acre feet and a vertical height not exceeding fifteen feet from the bottom of the channel to the bottom of the spillway to be used for stock watering purposes.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 525, § 4.

CSA:

C. 160, § 229.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-4.

35-49-104. Statutes inapplicable.

The provisions of sections 37-87-101 to 37-87-108 and 37-87-114 to 37-87-115, C.R.S., shall not apply to livestock water tanks of the character defined in section 35-49-103.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 525, § 3.

CSA:

C. 160, § 228.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-3.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1092, § 3, effective May 16.

35-49-105. Not used for irrigation.

No livestock water tanks constructed under the provisions of this article shall be used for irrigation purposes, and nothing contained in this article shall be construed as conferring upon the owner of any such livestock water tank a priority of use superior to any vested water right or to an adjudicated appropriation of water pursuant to state laws. Unless built upon an intermittent or perennial main stream, dams creating such livestock water tanks shall be deemed to have a rebuttable presumption that there is no injury to adjudicated water rights when built pursuant to the specifications set forth in section 35-49-103. If used solely for watering of livestock in areas known to be deficient in windmill water, having a pumping capacity of less than five gallons per minute, dams of greater capacity than those designated in section 35-49-103 may be constructed on any ephemeral stream, but in such event, the state engineer may require the construction of drainage facilities to reduce the water impounded in the reservoir to the capacity prescribed in section 35-49-103, within a thirty-six hour period.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 525, § 5.

CSA:

C. 160, § 230.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-5.

L. 67:

p. 180, § 1.

35-49-106. Plans submitted to state engineer.

Anyone proposing to construct a dam for the creation of a livestock water tank, as described in section 35-49-103, shall submit to the state engineer for approval an application on a form provided by the state engineer showing the general location of such proposed dam with reference to section, township, and range, location and dimensions of spillway, and the number, location, and size of dams already constructed within the watersheds of the dry channel on which such dam is proposed to be built. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to specify plans and specifications of such technical detail or nature as to require preparation by an engineer or construction of such stock water tanks under the supervision of an engineer; it being the intent and purpose of the provisions of this section that the state engineer shall be apprised by the completed application of pertinent information sufficient to enable the state engineer to ascertain the general location of the water tank, its operation in relation to tanks already constructed, its relative priority rights, its effect on existing appropriations of water, its capacity, its dam dimensions, the necessary and reasonable factors of safety, and its compliance with the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 526, § 6.

CSA:

C. 160, § 231.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-6.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2304, § 1, effective June 3.

35-49-107. Construction requirements.

The state engineer shall examine each application submitted and, if the state engineer approves the same, shall return one copy of each such application with the approval of the state engineer thereon to the person submitting the same and file the other copy at the office of the state engineer. If the state engineer disapproves such application, or any part thereof, the same shall be returned to the applicant for correction and revision. In cases where the state engineer deems it necessary, before approval thereof, the state engineer may inspect the proposed water tank site and make such independent investigation as necessary. Whether the state engineer approves such application, or disapproves it and returns the same for correction and revision, the state engineer shall act within fifteen days after the application is submitted. Until the approval by the state engineer of an application has been obtained, the construction of such dam is prohibited.

The provisions of this section and section 35-49-112 specifying approval by the state engineer and providing a fee therefor shall not apply to dams having a vertical height not exceeding five feet from the bottom of the channel to the bottom of the spillway and which impound not more than two acre feet of water.

Anyone proposing to construct a dam for the creation of a livestock water tank, as described in section 35-49-103, shall comply with section 35-49-106. Every owner of a proposed reservoir for stock watering purposes who desires to obtain a priority number for such structure shall comply fully with all pertinent provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 526, § 7.

CSA:

C. 160, § 232.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-7.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2305, § 2, effective June 3.

35-49-108. State engineer to inspect dam.

When such a dam is completed the state engineer shall be notified of such completion and, thereafter, may inspect said stock water tank. If the state engineer finds that the construction fails to conform with the application approved by the state engineer, it then becomes the duty of the owner of such dam to make such change and corrections therein as the state engineer has determined to be necessary to correct such failure, and when the same have been made, the state engineer shall provide in writing approval of such structure. Approval shall be granted by the state engineer upon reasonable compliance with the approved application and standard specifications. A livestock water tank shall not be disapproved because of failure to observe technical engineering details in construction.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 527, § 8.

CSA:

C. 160, § 233.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-8.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2305, § 3, effective June 3.

35-49-109. Priority determined - how.

The state engineer's certificate of approval of a livestock water tank on each normally dry stream and its tributaries shall be chronologically numbered in the order of approval and in concert with any erosion control dams approved pursuant to section 37-87-122, C.R.S. Priority of right as between such tanks located on or within the watershed of each such dry stream shall be determined by such numbers seriatim, number one being first in such right.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 527, § 9.

CSA:

C. 160, § 234.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-9.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2306, § 4, effective June 3.

35-49-110. Standard plans - publication.

The state engineer shall prepare and keep in file at the office of the state engineer standard plans, drawings, and specifications for livestock water tanks, which shall be subject to revision by the state engineer and shall in general be used as a guide by persons proposing to construct such tanks. Publication of these plans shall be subject to the approval and control of the executive director of the department of natural resources.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 528, § 10.

CSA:

C. 160, § 235.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-10.

L. 64:

p. 127, § 34.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2306, § 5, effective June 3.

35-49-111. When conduits not required.

Where, in the judgment of the state engineer, tanks upon any stream and its tributaries do not require conduits for purposes of safety or the protection of prior livestock water tank rights, it is lawful for the state engineer to approve an application not calling for conduits. Nothing in this section shall abrogate the right of any owner of a vested water right or appropriation of water to require such conduits in any case where necessary to protect such senior right.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 528, § 11.

CSA:

C. 160, § 236.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-11.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2306, § 6, effective June 3.

35-49-112. Fees deposited in general fund.

Each application for a livestock water tank submitted to the state engineer under the provisions of this article shall be accompanied by a fee of fifteen dollars. This fee shall be deposited by the state engineer with the state treasurer who shall credit all such fees to the general fund of the state.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 528, § 12.

CSA:

C. 160, § 237.

L. 51:

p. 789, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-12.

L. 61:

p. 185, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-12.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1616, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2306, § 7, effective June 3.

35-49-113. Assignment of priority number. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 41:

p. 528, § 13.

CSA:

C. 160, § 238.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-13.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 2306, § 8, effective June 3.

35-49-114. Approval required for reservoir. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 41:

p. 529, § 14.

CSA:

C. 160, § 239.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-14.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 2307, § 9, effective June 3.

35-49-115. Penalty.

The owner of any dam or reservoir failing to comply with the provisions of this article shall be subject to a penalty of not more than twenty-five dollars nor less than five dollars, to be recovered and disposed of as are fines for violations of section 37-87-114, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 529, § 15.

CSA:

C. 160, § 240.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-15.

35-49-116. Appropriation - transfer of funds.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate from the general fund moneys for the administration of this article.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 185, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 8-17-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-17-16.